Massachusetts, session 194th, H3093.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 59 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 52C the
following new section:-
Electronic filing requirements
Section 52D. Any form, return or filing required or permitted to be filed by the owner or
lessee of any real or personal property pursuant to sections 5, 5C, 29, 38D, 38F, 59 or 61A of this
chapter, shall be filed with or transmitted to the board of assessors in such manner, format and
medium as the board of assessors shall from time to time prescribe. Failure by the owner or
lessee to submit the filing in the manner, format and medium sought by the board of assessors is
equivalent to not filing or not responding.
of 2

Any request for information made by a board of assessors pursuant to sections 38D, 38F
or 61A of this chapter shall be made in any such manner, format, and medium as the board of
assessors shall from time to time prescribe.
of 2